District of Columbia statutes.
26-213

Forfeiture of stock.

Any nonadvanced shareholder failing to pay the instalments due on his share and the fines due from him for such time as the bylaws shall determine, shall forfeit his stock, but may, on application, receive a return of the amount paid in on account of his stock, less the accrued fines.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1300, ch. 854, § 698

History

1981 Ed., § 26-513.
1973 Ed., § 26-412.

Prior Codifications